es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Balones para rehabilitación: Balones de doble agarre; Balones de Slam; Balones blandos; Balones tonificantes; Balones tornado; Balones de pared
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Bolas medicinais: Bolas de pega dupla; Bolas com peso; Bolas macias; Bolas de tonificação; Bolas tornado; Bolas de parede
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Medicinbaly: Lopty s dvojitým úchopom; Lopty Slam Ball; Mäkké lopty; Masážne lopty; Lopty Tornado Ball; Lopty Wall Ball
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Medicine Balls: Dual-Grip Balls; Slam Balls; Soft Balls; Toning Balls; Tornado Balls; Wall Balls
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Medisinballer: Baller med dobbeltgrep; Slamballer; Softballer; Toningballer; Tornadoballer; Veggballer
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ลูกบอลน้ำหนัก: ลูกบอลแบบจับสองด้าน; สแลมบอล; ซอฟต์บอล; โทนนิ่งบอล; ทอร์นาโดบอล; ลูกบอลตบผนัง
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > メディシンボール: デュアルグリップボール; スラムボール; 柔らかいボール; トーニングボール; トルネードボール; ウォールボール
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Медицински топки: Топки с двоен захват; Топки за удряне; Меки топки; Топки за пилатес; Медицински топки на въже; Топки за стена
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Medizinbälle: Dual-Grip-Bälle; Slam-Bälle; Softbälle; Toning-Bälle; Tornado-Bälle; Wall Balls
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Ballons lestés: Balles à double prise; Médecine ball; Balles souples; Ballons Pilates; Balles Tornado; Balles murales
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Kuntopallot: Kahden käden kahvakuulat; Slam-pallot; Pehmeät pallot; Toning-pallot; Tornadopallot; Seinäpallot
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Медболы: Медболы с ручками; Слэмболы; Мягкие медболы; Утяжеленные мячи для пилатеса; Медболы на веревке; Медболы для бросков в стену
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Palle mediche: Palle a doppia impugnatura; Palle da Slam; Palle morbide; Palle tonificanti; Palle tornado; Palle da muro
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Medicinbaly: Medicinbaly se dvěma úchopy; Slambally; Softbally; Toning; Tornado; Wallbally
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Piłki lekarskie: Piłki do podwójnego uchwytu; Piłki slam ball; Miękkie piłki; Piłki wzmacniające; Tornado Balls; Piłki do odbijania od ściany
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 重力球: 双力度握力球; 击地球; 软球; 软式重力球; 橡胶药球; 墙球
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Medicinballen: Ballen met dubbele grip; Slamballen; Zachte ballen; Toningballen; Tornadoballen; Muurballen
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Medicinbolde: Bolde med dobbelt greb; Slambolde; Bløde bolde; Toningbolde; Tornado-bolde; Vægbolde
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Medicinlabdák: Kettős markolatú labdák; Dobósúlylabdák; Puha labdák; Tonizáló labdák; Tornádólabdák; Fallabdák
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Medicinske žoge: Žoge z dvojnim oprijemom; Žoge za udarjanje; Mehke žoge; Žoge za oblikovanje telesa; Medicinke z vrvjo; Žoge za udarjanje ob steno
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Sağlık Topları: Çift Kavramalı Toplar; Slam Topları; Yumuşak Toplar; Tonlama Topları; Tornado Topları; Duvar Topları
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Medicininiai kamuoliai: Kamuoliai su dviem rankenomis; Sunkūs kamuoliai; Minkšti kamuoliai; Tonuso kamuoliai; Kamuoliai „Tornado“; Sieniniai kamuoliai
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Medicinbollar: Dubbelgreppbollar; Medicinboll; Mjuka bollar; Pilatesbollar; Tornadobollar; Väggbollar
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Medicine balls: Bolas de dupla aderência; Bolas de slam; Bolas macias; Bolas tonificantes; Bolas tornado; Bolas de parede
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Mingi medicinale: Mingi cu mâner dublu; Mingi pentru antrenamente de forță; Mingi moi; Mingi pentru tonifiere; Mingi Tornado; Mingi pentru aruncări la perete
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Μπάλες γυμναστικής (Medicine balls): Μπάλες με διπλή λαβή; Μπάλες Slam (για ασκήσεις ρίψεων & χτυπημάτων); Μαλακές μπάλες; Μπάλες τόνωσης; Μπάλες Tornado για ασκήσεις περιστροφής; Μπάλες τοίχου
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Bóng thuốc: Bóng có hai tay cầm; Bóng cát; Bóng mềm; Bóng tập săn chắc; Bóng tập văng; Bóng tập với tường
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 運動球: 雙握力球; 滿貫球; 軟球; 調整球; 龍捲風球; 牆球
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Medicinke: Lopte s dvostrukom ručkom; Slam lopte; Meke lopte; Lopte za pilates; Tornado lopte; Lopte za bacanje na zid
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 메디신 볼: 듀얼 그립 볼; 슬램 볼; 소프트 볼; 토닝 볼; 로프가 달린 메디신 볼; 월 볼